District of Columbia statutes.
47-1047

ARCH Training Center, lots 80, 81, and 949 in Square 5861.

The properties located in the District of Columbia described as lots 80, 81, and 949, in square 5861 situated at 747-775 Howard Road, S.E., owned, occupied, and used by the ARCH Training Center, are hereby exempt from all taxation so long as these same properties continue to be so owned and occupied, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002, providing for exemption of certain real properties.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-195, § 2, 45 DCR 7989

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1047.